California, session 20252026, AB429.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 17139.4 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17139.4.SECTION 1. Section 17139.8 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17139.8. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with any of the following:(A) The 2021 Dixie Fire.(B) The 2022 Mill Fire.(C)The 2024 Park Fire.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:(A) In relation to the 2021 Dixie Fire, the following: (i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Butte, Plumas, Lassen, Shasta, or Tehama during the 2021 Dixie Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2021 Dixie Fire.(ii) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Butte, Plumas, Lassen, Shasta, or Tehama during the 2021 Dixie Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2021 Dixie Fire.(iii) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Butte, Plumas, Lassen, Shasta, or Tehama during the 2021 Dixie Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2021 Dixie Fire.(B) In relation to the 2022 Mill Fire, the following:(i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Siskiyou during the 2022 Mill Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2022 Mill Fire.(ii) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Siskiyou during the 2022 Mill Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2022 Mill Fire.(iii) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Siskiyou during the 2022 Mill Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2022 Mill Fire.(C)In relation to the 2024 Park Fire, the following:(i)Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Butte or Tehama during the 2024 Park Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2024 Park Fire.(ii)Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Butte or Tehama during the 2024 Park Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2024 Park Fire.(iii)Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Butte or Tehama during the 2024 Park Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2024 Park Fire.(3) “Settlement entity” means the following:(A) In relation to the 2021 Dixie Fire, Pacific Gas and Electric Company or its subsidiary making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.(B) In relation to the 2022 Mill Fire, Roseburg Forest Products or its subsidiary or agent making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer. (C)In relation to the 2024 Park Fire, an entity, approved by a class action settlement administrator, making a settlement payment related to the 2024 Park Fire to a qualified taxpayer.(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.(d) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41 in regards to the exclusion provided by this section and Section 24309.8, 24309.9, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:(A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax exclusion is to provide essential relief to individuals who have suffered injury, loss, inconvenience, and expenses resulting from the devastating 2021 Dixie Fire, 2022 Mill Fire, and 2024 Park Fire. Fire or 2022 Mill Fire. (B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the exclusion achieves the stated goal, purpose, and objective shall be the number of qualified taxpayers that excluded qualified amounts from gross income, and the aggregate amount of settlement payments arising out of the 2021 Dixie Fire, the 2022 Mill Fire, or the 2024 Park Fire. Fire or 2022 Mill Fire.(2) (A) On December 1, 2027, the Franchise Tax Board shall deliver to the Legislature a written report that includes both of the following: (i) To the extent feasible, the number of qualified taxpayers that excluded qualified amounts from gross income, as a result of the exclusion. (ii) The aggregate amount of those settlement payments arising out of the 2021 Dixie Fire, the 2022 Mill Fire, or the 2024 Park Fire. Fire or 2022 Mill Fire.(B) The report required by this paragraph shall be delivered to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. (C) The disclosure provisions of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542. (e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2.Section 24309.8 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:24309.8.SEC. 2. Section 24309.9 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:24309.9. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with any of the following:(A) The 2021 Dixie Fire.(B) The 2022 Mill Fire.(C)The 2024 Park Fire.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:(A) In relation to the 2021 Dixie Fire, the following: (i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Butte, Plumas, Lassen, Shasta, or Tehama during the 2021 Dixie Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2021 Dixie Fire.(ii) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Butte, Plumas, Lassen, Shasta, or Tehama during the 2021 Dixie Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2021 Dixie Fire.(B) In relation to the 2022 Mill Fire, the following:(i) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Siskiyou during the 2022 Mill Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2022 Mill Fire.(ii) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Siskiyou during the 2022 Mill Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2022 Mill Fire.(C)In relation to the 2024 Park Fire, the following:(i)Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Butte or Tehama during the 2024 Park Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2024 Park Fire.(ii)Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Butte or Tehama during the 2024 Park Fire that paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2024 Park Fire.(3) “Settlement entity” means the following:(A) In relation to the 2021 Dixie Fire, Pacific Gas and Electric Company or its subsidiary making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.(B) In relation to the 2022 Mill Fire, Roseburg Forest Products or its subsidiary or agent making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.(C)In relation to the 2024 Park Fire, _____ (entity) or its subsidiary or agent making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 17139.4 and 24309.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as added by this act, are necessary for the public purpose of preventing undue hardship to taxpayers who reside, or used to reside, in a part of California devastated by fire, and do not constitute a gift of public funds within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to provide essential relief to those persons who have suffered injury, loss, inconvenience, and expenses resulting from the devastating 2021 Dixie Fire, Fire or 2022 Mill Fire, and the 2024 Park Fire, as soon as possible, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.